Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 6 Construction of Will; Testamentary Gifts

53-4-55.
Construction of wills; intention of testator.

In the construction of all wills, the court shall seek diligently for the intention of the testator and shall give effect to such intention as far as it may be consistent with the rules of law. Provided the proof of intention is clear and convincing, the court may transpose sentences or clauses, change conjunctions, and supply or delete words in cases in which a sentence or clause as it stands is unintelligible or inoperative in context.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-55

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For note discussing construction and interpretation of wills, see 1 Ga. L. Rev. No. 1, p. 46 (1927).

For article discussing problems in construction of instrument conveying gift to a group or class, see 6 Ga. St. B.J. 169 (1969).

For article, “The Time Gap in Wills: Shifting Assets and Shrinking Estates — Obsolescence and Testamentary Planning in Georgia,” see 6 Ga. L. Rev. 649 (1972).

For annual survey of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 403 (2005).

53-4-56.
Construction of wills; parol evidence.

In construing a will, the court may hear parol evidence of the circumstances surrounding the testator at the time of execution to explain all ambiguities, whether latent or patent.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-56

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-4-57.
Partial illegality of will.

If a will is illegal in part, the part that is legal may be sustained; but if the whole will so constitutes one testamentary scheme that the legal portion alone cannot give effect to the testator’s intention, the whole will shall fail.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-57

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (2004).

53-4-58.
Failure to provide for living child believed dead.

If at the time of execution of the will the testator fails to provide in the will for a living child of the testator solely because the testator believes the child to be dead, the child is entitled to receive a share in the estate as follows:

If the testator had no other child living at the time the will was executed, an omitted child receives a share equal in value to that which the child would have received had the testator died intestate but only to the extent that any provision in the will to or for the benefit of the surviving parent of the omitted child is not thereby reduced; or

If the will contains testamentary gifts to one or more other children of the testator, an omitted child is entitled to receive the share of the estate that the child would have received had the testator included all omitted children with the children to whom testamentary gifts were made under the will and had given an equal share to each child. To the extent feasible, the interest granted an omitted child must be of the same character, whether legal or equitable, present or future, as that left to the testator’s other children under the will. In satisfying the share for the omitted child, the shares of the other children shall abate ratably, preserving to the maximum extent possible the testamentary plan adopted by the testator.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-58

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For note, “Wills — Mistake of Fact as to the Existence or Conduct of an Heir,” see 1 Ga. St. B.J. 543 (1965).

For article discussing the pretermitted heir, see 10 Ga. L. Rev. 447 (1976).

For article advocating repeal of this Code section, or amendment to eliminate relief for all mistakes but belief in the existence of an heir, see 11 Ga. L. Rev. 297 (1977).

53-4-59.
Specific, demonstrative, general, or residuary testamentary gifts.

Testamentary gifts may be specific, demonstrative, general, or residuary. A specific testamentary gift directs the delivery of property particularly designated. A demonstrative testamentary gift designates the fund or property from which the gift is to be satisfied but nevertheless is an unconditional gift of the amount or value specified. A general testamentary gift does not direct the delivery of any particular property. A residuary testamentary gift includes all the property of the estate that is not effectively disposed of by other provisions of the will.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-59

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For article discussing problems in construction of instrument conveying gift to a group or class, see 6 Ga. St. B.J. 169 (1969).

For article surveying wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 323 (1982).

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 231 (2014).

53-4-60.
Income, profit, or increase of specific testamentary gifts.

The income, profit, or increase of specific testamentary gifts, as a general rule, goes with the gift though the time of enjoyment or vesting may be postponed.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-60

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Time Gap in Wills: Shifting Assets and Shrinking Estates — Obsolescence and Testamentary Planning in Georgia,” see 6 Ga. L. Rev. 649 (1972).

For note, “Determining Principal and Income Allocation in Georgia Trusts,” see 8 Ga. St. B.J. 564 (1972).

53-4-61.
Time at which general or demonstrative testamentary gift bears interest.

A general or demonstrative testamentary gift usually bears interest at the legal rate after the expiration of 12 months from the death of the testator; provided, however, that when a general or demonstrative testamentary gift is to be paid at a later time or upon a later event, it bears no interest until such time or event.

The general rule described in subsection (a) of this Code section yields to the equity and necessity of a particular case if the condition of the estate as to the payment of debts and testamentary gifts is doubtful or if the fund out of which the testamentary gift is to be paid is unavailable for all the charges made upon it or if any other equitable circumstance intervenes.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-61

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Time Gap in Wills: Shifting Assets and Shrinking Estates — Obsolescence and Testamentary Planning in Georgia,” see 6 Ga. L. Rev. 649 (1972).

For note, “Determining Principal and Income Allocation in Georgia Trusts,” see 8 Ga. St. B.J. 564 (1972).

53-4-62.
Testamentary gift to charity.

If a testamentary gift to a charity cannot be executed in the exact manner provided by the testator, the superior court may exercise equitable powers in such a way as will as nearly as possible effectuate the intention of the testator.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-62

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For article discussing the validity of charitable gifts in Georgia, see 1 Ga. B.J. 16 (1939).

For comment on Creech v. Scottish Rite Hosp. for Crippled Children,

211 Ga. 195

,

84 S.E.2d 563

(1954), see
17 Ga. B.J. 512 (1955).

For note on discriminatory charitable trusts in Georgia, with regard to application of the cy pres doctrine, in light of Evans v. Newton, 382 U.S. 296,

86 S. Ct. 486

,

15 L. Ed. 2

d 373 (1966), see
6 Ga. St. B.J. 428 (1970).

For comment on Evans v. Abney, 396 U.S. 435,

90 S. Ct. 628

,

24 L. Ed. 2

d 634 (1970), see
22 Mercer L. Rev. 493 (1971).

For comment on Trammell v. Elliott,

230 Ga. 841

,

199 S.E.2d 194

(1973), see
10 Ga. St. B.J. 502 (1974).

For article, “The Rule Against Perpetuities as Applied to Georgia Wills and Trusts,” see 16 Ga. L. Rev. 235 (1982).

For article, “Private Trusts for the Provision of Private Goods,” see 37 Emory L.J. 295 (1988).

53-4-63.
Payment of debts of testator and expenses of estate administrator.

Unless otherwise directed, the debts of the testator and expenses of administration of the estate shall be paid out of the residuum. Unless otherwise provided in the will, a residuary gift or any part thereof, including a residuary gift to a surviving spouse in lieu of year’s support, shall be deemed a gift of the net residuum or part thereof remaining after all debts of the testator and expenses of administration of the estate, including taxes, have been paid.

If the residuum proves to be insufficient for the payment of the debts of the testator and the expenses of administration of the estate, then general testamentary gifts shall abate pro rata to make up the deficiency. If general testamentary gifts are insufficient, then demonstrative testamentary gifts shall abate in the same manner. If both general and demonstrative gifts are insufficient, then specific gifts shall abate in the same manner.

After the estate assets in the hands of the personal representative are exhausted, a creditor may proceed against each beneficiary for that beneficiary’s pro rata share of the debts to the extent a testamentary gift has been distributed to that beneficiary.

Realty and personalty shall be equally liable for the payment of debts.

Unless otherwise expressly directed in the will, nothing in this Code section shall be deemed to limit any rights to reimbursement for federal estate taxes, generation-skipping transfer taxes, or any other taxes that may be available to personal representatives under federal law.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-63

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-14/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subsection (a), inserted “and expenses of administration of the estate” in the first sentence, and in the second sentence, inserted “of the testator” and “of the estate”; in the first sentence in subsection (b), substituted “debts of the testator” for “testator’s debts” and inserted “of the estate”; and substituted “hands of the personal representative” for “executor’s hands” in subsection (c).

Law reviews.

For article, “The Time Gap in Wills: Shifting Assets and Shrinking Estates — Obsolescence and Testamentary Planning in Georgia,” see 6 Ga. L. Rev. 649 (1972).

For article surveying legislative and judicial developments in Georgia’s will, trusts, and estate laws, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (1979).

For article, “Tax Apportionment Problems under the Georgia Probate Code,” see 8 Ga. St. B.J. 16 (2003).

53-4-64.
Death of beneficiary before will executed or before death of testator.

If a beneficiary is dead when the will is executed or otherwise dies before the testator, but has any descendants living at the death of the testator, the testamentary gift, if absolute and without remainder or limitation, shall not lapse but shall vest in the descendants of the beneficiary in the same proportions as if inherited directly from the deceased beneficiary under the intestacy laws of this state.

The provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section shall also apply to a testamentary gift to a class unless there appears a clear intent to the contrary.

If a beneficiary is treated as having predeceased the testator due to a divorce or annulment, as provided in Code Section 53-4-49, or due to the beneficiary being responsible for the death of the testator, as provided in Code Section 53-1-5, the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section shall apply only to vest the testamentary gift in descendants of the beneficiary who are also descendants of the testator.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-64

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Time Gap in Wills: Problems Under Georgia’s Lapse Statutes,” see 6 Ga. L. Rev. 268 (1972).

For article, “The Time Gap in Wills: Shifting Assets and Shrinking Estates — Obsolescence and Testamentary Planning in Georgia,” see 6 Ga. L. Rev. 649 (1972).

For article, “Descendible Future Interests in Georgia: The Effect of the Preference for Early Vesting,” see 7 Ga. L. Rev. 443 (1973).

For article surveying developments in Georgia wills, trusts, and administration of estates law from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 307 (1981).

For article, “Lapse Statutes: Recurring Construction Problems,” see 37 Emory L.J. 323 (1988).

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration for the period from June 1, 2002 to May 31, 2003, see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 459 (2003).

For note, “Vesting Title in a Murderer:
Where is the Equity in the Georgia Supreme Court’s Interpretation of the Slayer Statute in Levenson?,” see 45 Ga. L. Rev. 877 (2011).

53-4-65.
Disposition of lapsed or void testamentary gift of residuum.

A lapsed or void testamentary gift of realty or personalty shall become part of the residuum.

A lapsed or void gift of the residuum shall be deemed a part of the share of the other residuary beneficiaries in proportion to their original shares of the residuum. If there are no other residuary beneficiaries, a lapsed or void gift of the residuum shall pass by intestacy.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-65

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-4-66.
Ademption or destruction of specific testamentary gift.

Except as provided in Code Section 53-4-67, a specific testamentary gift is adeemed or destroyed, wholly or in part, when the testator for any reason does not own the subject of such gift at death.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-66

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Time Gap in Wills: Shifting Assets and Shrinking Estates — Obsolescence and Testamentary Planning in Georgia,” see 6 Ga. L. Rev. 649 (1972).

53-4-67.
Exchange, loss, theft, destruction, or condemnation of testamentary gift.

If the testator exchanges property which is the subject of a specific testamentary gift for other property of like character, or merely changes the investment of a fund so given, the testator’s intention shall be deemed to be to substitute the one for the other, and the testamentary gift shall not fail.

If, within six months prior to the testator’s death, property which is the subject of a specific testamentary gift is lost, stolen, or destroyed, and if such loss, theft, or destruction is covered, wholly or in part, by insurance, the specific beneficiary has the right to any proceeds of such insurance that are unpaid at the testator’s death or, if any such proceeds have been paid prior to the testator’s death, to a pecuniary gift equal to the amount of the proceeds so paid. The foregoing provisions shall also apply if the property is damaged but not destroyed, except that the amount of the insurance proceeds or the pecuniary gift to be paid to the specific beneficiary shall be reduced by the cost of any repairs made to the damaged property by the testator or the testator’s personal representative.

If, within six months prior to the testator’s death, property which is the subject of a specific testamentary gift is taken by condemnation, the beneficiary has the right to any award for such condemnation unpaid at the testator’s death or, if any such award has been paid prior to the testator’s death, to a pecuniary gift equal to the amount of the award so paid.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-67

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Time Gap in Wills: Shifting Assets and Shrinking Estates — Obsolescence and Testamentary Planning in Georgia,” see 6 Ga. L. Rev. 649 (1972).

53-4-68.
Conditions that are impossible, illegal, or against public policy; conditions in terrorem.

Conditions in a will that are impossible, illegal, or against public policy shall be void.

A condition in terrorem shall be void unless there is a direction in the will as to the disposition of the property if the condition in terrorem is violated, in which event the direction in the will shall be carried out, except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this Code section.

A condition in terrorem shall not be enforceable against an interested person for:

Bringing an action for interpretation or enforcement of a will;

Bringing an action for an accounting, for removal, or for other relief against a personal representative; or

Entering into a settlement agreement.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-68

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-15/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, added “, except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this Code section” at the end of subsection (b); and added subsection (c).

Law reviews.

For article surveying developments in Georgia wills, trusts, and administration of estates law from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 307 (1981).

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration for the period from June 1, 2002 to May 31, 2003, see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 459 (2003).

For article with annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (2021).

53-4-69.
Election by beneficiary with claim adverse to will.

A beneficiary taking under a will shall allow all the provisions of the will to be executed as far as the beneficiary can. A beneficiary who has a claim adverse to the will shall be required to elect whether to claim under the will or against it. However, the mere fact that the beneficiary is also a creditor shall not necessitate an election.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-69

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Cross references.

Equitable principles governing elections between benefits, §

23-1-24

.

53-4-70.
Election by beneficiary owning testamentary gift of property.

When a testator has attempted to make a testamentary gift of property that is not the testator’s own and has also given a benefit to a person to whom the property belongs, the person shall elect to take either under the will or against the will.

An election pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section shall not be required if:

The will itself, from other causes, is not effective in passing title to the property in question;

The testator has an interest in the property in question upon which the will may operate;

The testamentary gift shows that the testator intended to give the property only in the event that the testator’s own title was good; or

The benefit given to the person called upon to elect is not from the testator’s own property but is by virtue of a power of appointment in the testator.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-70

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Cross references.

Equitable principles governing elections between benefits, §

23-1-24

.

Applicability of section to deeds, §

44-5-37

.

53-4-71.
Compensation to defeated beneficiary electing against will.

If, pursuant to Code Sections 53-4-69 and 53-4-70, an election is made against the will, the defeated beneficiary shall be entitled to compensation out of the property bequeathed to the person who made the election, up to the value of the defeated testamentary gift.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-71

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Cross references.

Equitable principles governing elections between benefits, §

23-1-24

.

Applicability of section to deeds, §

44-5-37

.

53-4-72.
Passing of after-acquired property.

All property owned by the testator at death that was acquired subsequent to the making of a will shall pass under the will if the provisions of the will are sufficiently broad to embrace the property.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-72

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-4-73.
Disposition of heart pacemakers.

Any individual who is 18 years of age or older and of sound mind may provide for the sale by contract or by will of a heart pacemaker implanted within the individual, such disposition to be made at death. If the sale is by will, it shall be effective without probate.

When individuals in prior classes are not available at the time of death of an individual having a heart pacemaker and in the absence of a disposition contract or will, actual notice of contrary indications by the decedent, and actual opposition by a member of the same or a prior class, any of the following individuals, in order of priority stated, may sell the heart pacemaker:

The spouse;

An adult son or daughter;

Either parent;

An adult brother or sister;

A guardian of the person of the decedent at the time of the decedent’s death other than a guardian ad litem appointed for such purpose; or

Any other person authorized or under obligation to dispose of the body.

If a buyer has actual notice of contrary indications by the decedent or actual notice that a sale by a member of a class is opposed by a member of the same or a prior class, no valid sale may be made. The persons authorized by subsection (b) of this Code section may make the sale only after the time of death of the individual having the heart pacemaker.

Unless otherwise provided in a will or contract, all proceeds from sales under this Code section shall be added to the estate of the decedent.

Sales of pacemakers under this Code section shall be subject to:

Medical acceptability of the heart pacemaker for reuse; and

The laws of this state relating to autopsies.

This Code section shall not apply to the sale or gift of a nuclear-powered pacemaker.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-73

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Cross references.

Persons authorized to receive donations of heart pacemakers, § 31-1-6.

Anatomical gifts, §

44-5-140

et seq.

Post-mortem examinations, § 45-16-20 et seq.

53-4-74.
Pecuniary marital deduction testamentary gift or transfer.

As used in this Code section, the term “marital deduction testamentary gift or transfer” means a testamentary gift or transfer of assets, including cash, which qualifies for the federal estate tax marital deduction.

Where a will or trust agreement authorizes or requires an executor, administrator, or trustee to satisfy a pecuniary marital deduction testamentary gift or transfer wholly or partly by a distribution of assets in kind at values which are finally determined for federal estate tax purposes or at values which are determined by reference to such federal estate tax valuation, the executor, administrator, or trustee, in satisfaction of the pecuniary marital deduction bequest or transfer, shall distribute assets, including cash, which shall have an aggregate fair market value fairly representative of the distributee’s proportionate share of the appreciation or depreciation, from the date or dates of federal estate tax valuation to the date or dates of distribution in satisfaction of the pecuniary marital deduction bequest or transfer.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-74

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For note, “Advantages and Disadvantages of Intestate Death for Married Persons with an Estate of $120,000 or Less,” see 9 Ga. St. B.J. 102 (1972).

53-4-75.
[Repealed] Construction of wills and trust instruments referring to federal estate and generation-skipping transfer tax laws.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-75

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 552, § 1/SB 461; Code 1981, §

53-4-75

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 552, § 1/SB 461; repealed by Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-16/HB 865, effective January 1, 2021.